Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.070

Rejection by voters of nonhigh districts—Additional elections—Revised plan—Annexation proposal.

In the event that a proposal or proposals for providing capital funds as provided in RCW 28A.540.060 is not approved by the voters of a nonhigh school district a second election thereon shall be held within sixty days thereafter. If the vote of the electors of the nonhigh school district is again in the negative, the high school students residing therein shall not be entitled to admission to the high school under the provisions of RCW 28A.225.210, following the close of the school year during which the second election is held: PROVIDED, That in any such case the regional committee on school district organization shall determine within thirty days after the date of the aforesaid election the advisability of initiating a proposal for annexation of such nonhigh school district to the school district in which the proposed facilities are to be located or to some other district where its students can attend high school without undue inconvenience: PROVIDED FURTHER, That pending such determination by the regional committee and action thereon as required by law the board of directors of the high school district shall continue to admit high school students residing in the nonhigh school district. Any proposal for annexation of a nonhigh school district initiated by a regional committee shall be subject to the procedural requirements of this chapter respecting a public hearing and submission to and approval by the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025. Upon approval by the superintendent of public instruction of any such proposal, the educational service district superintendent shall make an order , establishing the annexation.

[ 2006 c 263 s 329; 1990 c 33 s 486; 1985 c 385 s 36; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 77; 1971 c 48 s 24; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.060. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 7; 1955 c 344 s 6; 1953 c 229 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.56.060, 28.56.060.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.